Utah statutes.
11-17-15.   Public bidding laws and rules not applicable.
The provisions of the various laws of the state of Utah and the rules or
ordinances of the county or municipality which would otherwise require public
bidding in respect to the acquisition, financing, management, funding,
construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, equipping, and
furnishing of a project shall have no application to same.
